src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pl.aff
SFX I   i         i         [^ z]ci 
SFX I             my        [^ z]ci 
SFX I             cie       [^ z]ci 
SFX I   i                   [^ z]ci 
SFX I   i         z         zci 
SFX I             sz        zci 
SFX I             0         zci 
SFX I             my        zci 
SFX I             cie       zci 
SFX I   i         z         zci 
SFX I   i         z         si 
SFX I             sz        si 
SFX I             0         si 
SFX I             my        si 
SFX I             cie       si 
SFX I   i         z         si 
SFX I    ci       szcz       ci 
SFX I             sz         ci 
SFX I             0          ci 
SFX I             cie        ci 
SFX I             my         ci 
SFX I    ci       szcz       ci 
SFX I             dn        [pr]a  
SFX I             dniesz    [pr]a  
SFX I             dnie      [pr]a  
SFX I             dniemy    [pr]a  
SFX I             dniecie   [pr]a  
SFX I             dn        [pr]a  
SFX I             d          a  
SFX I             dziesz     a  
SFX I             dzie       a  
SFX I             dziemy     a  
SFX I             dziecie    a  
SFX I             d          a  
SFX I             d         i   
SFX I             dziesz    i   
SFX I             dzie      i   
SFX I             dziemy    i   
SFX I             dziecie   i   
SFX I             d         i   
SFX I              d        z   
SFX I              dziesz   z   
SFX I              dzie     z   
SFX I              dziemy   z   
SFX I              dziecie  z   
SFX I              d        z   
SFX I             d         j  
SFX I             dziesz    j  
SFX I             dzie      j  
SFX I             dziemy    j  
SFX I             dziecie   j  
SFX I             d         j  
SFX I   e         od        wie  
SFX I   e         edziesz   wie  
SFX I   e         edzie     wie  
SFX I   e         edziemy   wie  
SFX I   e         edziecie  wie  
SFX I   e         od        wie  
SFX I   e         ot        le  
SFX I   e         eciesz    le  
SFX I   e         ecie      le  
SFX I   e         eciemy    le  
SFX I   e         eciecie   le  
SFX I   e         ot        le  
SFX I   e         ot        mie  
SFX I   e         eciesz    mie  
SFX I   e         ecie      mie  
SFX I   e         eciemy    mie  
SFX I   e         eciecie   mie  
SFX I   e         ot        mie  
SFX I   e         ot        gnie  
SFX I   e         eciesz    gnie  
SFX I   e         ecie      gnie  
SFX I   e         eciemy    gnie  
SFX I   e         eciecie   gnie  
SFX I   e         ot        gnie  
SFX I            osn       r  
SFX I            o niesz   r  
SFX I            o nie     r  
SFX I            o niemy   r  
SFX I            o niecie  r  
SFX I            osn       r  
SFX I             m         je  
SFX I             sz        je  
SFX I             0         je  
SFX I             my        je  
SFX I             cie       je  
SFX I             dz        je  
SFX I   e         os        [^g]nie  
SFX I   e         esiesz    [^g]nie  
SFX I   e         esie      [^g]nie  
SFX I   e         esiemy    [^g]nie  
SFX I   e         esiecie   [^g]nie  
SFX I   e         os        [^g]nie  
SFX I   y                   [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I             sz        [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I             0         [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I             my        [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I             cie       [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I   y                   [^bmrtw]y 
SFX I             j         [mrtw]y 
SFX I             jesz      [mrtw]y 
SFX I             je        [mrtw]y 
SFX I             jemy      [mrtw]y 
SFX I             jecie     [mrtw]y 
SFX I             j         [mrtw]y 
SFX I   by        b d       by 
SFX I   by        b dziesz  by 
SFX I   by        b dzie    by 
SFX I   by        b dziemy  by 
SFX I   by        b dziecie by 
SFX I   by        b d       by 
SFX I   le        jd        le  
SFX I   le        jdziesz   le  
SFX I   le        jdzie     le  
SFX I   le        jdziemy   le  
SFX I   le        jdziecie  le  
SFX I   le        jd        le  
SFX I              zn          
SFX I              niesz      
SFX I              nie        
SFX I              niemy      
SFX I              niecie     
SFX I              zn          
SFX I   e                   [er] e 
SFX I   e         ysz       [er] e 
SFX I   e         y         [er] e 
SFX I   e         ymy       [er] e 
SFX I   e         ycie      [er] e 
SFX I   e                   [er] e 
SFX I   e         ej        [^er] e 
SFX I   e         ejesz     [^er] e 
SFX I   e         eje       [^er] e 
SFX I   e         ejemy     [^er] e 
SFX I   e         ejecie    [^er] e 
SFX I   e         ej        [^er] e 
